District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0700.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
Act may be cited as the “Reservoir District Tax Exemption Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2. § 47–4683 is amended as follows:
(a) Section 47-4683(b)(2) is amended to read as follows:
“(2) Set aside 1/3 of the operating rental housing units in the Property as
affordable as defined by 26 U.S. Code § 42(g)(2)(A). The units designated as affordable will be
available to households qualifying for the 80 Percent Income Limit Category of the Multifamily
Tax Subsidy Project Income Limits for the Washington-Arlington-Alexandria, DC-VA-MD
HUD Metro Fair Market Rent Area as reported annually by the US Department of Housing and
Urban Development and made in a manner consistent with I.R.C. § 142(d)(2)(B).
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Budget Director as the fiscal impact
statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).


Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
Columbia Register.